apertium-dan-nor.nno.dix
<pardef n="t/o__n">
<e>       <p><l>ørne</l>  <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ør</l>    <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>oa</l>    <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>oi</l>    <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>o</l>     <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>oa</l>    <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>oi</l>    <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>o</l>     <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>oet</l>   <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>o</l>     <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="skyldm/ark__n">
<e>       <p><l>erkene</l><r>ark<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>erker</l> <r>ark<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>arka</l>  <r>ark<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>arki</l>  <r>ark<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ark</l>   <r>ark<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pen/ny__n">
<e r="LR"><p><l>cane</l>  <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>nyane</l> <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ce</l>    <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ny</l>    <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>nyar</l>  <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>nyen</l>  <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ny</l>    <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="WC__n">
<!-- wsd todo (world cup..) -->
<e>       <p><l>-ane</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ane</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>-ar</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ar</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>-en</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>en</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>-a</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>-i</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>-et</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="r/ot__n">
<e>       <p><l>øtene</l> <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>øter</l>  <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ota</l>   <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>oti</l>   <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ot</l>    <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ota</l>   <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>oti</l>   <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ot</l>    <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>otet</l>  <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ot</l>    <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sysake/r__n">
<e>       <p><l>ne</l>    <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>r</l>     <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="r/and__n">
<!-- wsd todo -->
<e r="LR"><p><l>andene</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>endene</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ander</l> <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ender</l> <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>anda</l>  <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>andi</l>  <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>and</l>   <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>andane</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>and</l>   <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>anden</l> <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>and</l>   <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kop/pel__n">
<e>       <p><l>la</l>    <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>li</l>    <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>pel</l>   <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>let</l>   <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>pelet</l> <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>pel</l>   <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="metr/um__n">
<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>aa</l>    <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ai</l>    <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>uma</l>   <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>umi</l>   <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>um</l>    <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>et</l>    <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>umet</l>  <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>um</l>    <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\s"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="sentrum">         <i>sentr</i><par n="metr/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="bygdesentrum"><i>bygdesentr</i><par n="metr/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="bysentrum"><i>bysentr</i><par n="metr/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="kultursentrum"><i>kultursentr</i><par n="metr/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="kunstsentrum"><i>kunstsentr</i><par n="metr/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="penny"><i>pen</i><par n="pen/ny__n"/></e>
<e lm="rand"><i>r</i><par n="r/and__n"/></e>
<e lm="spektrum"><i>spektr</i><par n="metr/um__n"/></e>
